Massachusetts, session 194th, S1422.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 76 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 1B the following section:-
Section 1C. The school committee of a city, town or regional school district shall
establish a naloxone overdose prevention program. Said program shall require every school
nurse to be trained in naloxone assistance and have naloxone in nurse’s office. Said program may
be developed with the assistance from the department of education and department of public
health.
In accordance with rules adopted by the department of education and department of
public health, a public school shall offer training to secondary students on how to administer
naloxone hydrochloride, in nasal spray form. The rules adopted by the departments under this
of 2

section must provide that the training is an extracurricular instruction, that instruction is
delivered by a qualified individual and that the standards for instruction are based on those of a
nationally recognized program, organization or agency.
of 2